District of Columbia statutes.
38-1905

Vocational education.

The Board of Education is authorized and empowered to establish occupational schools on the elementary school level for pupils not prepared to pursue vocational courses in the trade or vocational schools and also to carry on trade or vocational courses on the senior high school level or in senior high schools.

Apr. 10, 1936, 49 Stat. 1194, ch. 175, § 4

History

1981 Ed., § 31-1004.
1973 Ed., § 31-614.

Prior Codifications